New Jersey, session 221, S2369.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The Legislature finds and declares that public safety will be enhanced by preventing sex offenders, who have committed crimes against minors, from residing within 500 feet of certain areas where children congregate.  It is not the intent of the Legislature to further penalize certain sex offenders. 2.    When a person who is listed on the Internet registry maintained by the Superintendent of the State Police pursuant to section 2 of P.L.2001, c.167 (C.2C:7-13) registers with the chief law enforcement officer of a municipality, the chief law enforcement officer shall forward the name and address of the person registering to the members of the governing body of the municipality.  If a person is listed on the Internet registry maintained by the Superintendent of the State Police pursuant to section 2 of P.L.2001, c.167 (C.2C:7-13) and required to register with the Superintendent of State Police pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1994, c.133 (C.2C:7-2) because the person is moving to a municipality that does not have a police force, then the Superintendent of State Police shall forward the name and address of the person registering to the members of the governing body of the municipality where the person registering intends to reside. 3.    It shall be unlawful for a person subject to the registration requirements set forth in P.L.1994, c.133 (C.2C:7-1 et seq.) who has committed a sex offense as defined in section 2 of P.L.1994, c.133 (C.2C:7-2) and whose victim was under the age of 18 to reside within 500 feet of the real property comprising an elementary or secondary school, child care center as defined in section 3 of P.L.1983, c.492  (C.30:5B-3), or playground as defined in section 1 of P.L.1999, c.50 (C.52:27D-123.9) unless: a.     The person is required to serve a sentence at a jail, prison, juvenile facility, or other correctional institution or facility which is located within 500 feet of the real property comprising an elementary or secondary school, child care center, or playground; b.    The person is receiving treatment at a mental health facility located within 500 feet of the real property comprising an elementary or secondary school, child care center, or playground; c.     The person established the residence prior to the effective date of this act; d.    An elementary or secondary school, child care center, or playground is built or established within 500 feet of the person's existing residence; e.     The parole board, after considering an individual's housing options, determines that a needs based exception is required; or f.     A court that discharges the person from a psychiatric facility with conditions pursuant to section 15 of P.L.1987, c.116 (C.30:4-27.15) determines that an exemption is appropriate. 4.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the sixth month following enactment.